Wyoming, session 2025, SF0077.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-14-601 is created to read:
ARTICLE 6
COMPELLED OR PROHIBITED SPEECH
9-14-601. Compelled speech; civil action.
(a) The state and its political subdivisions shall
not compel or require an employee to refer to another
employee using that employee's preferred pronouns:
(i) As a condition of continuing or commencing
employment or contracting with the state or a political
subdivision;
(ii) As a condition of receiving a grant, loan,
permit, contract, license or other benefit afforded by the
state or a political subdivision; or
(iii) Under threat of adverse action by the
state or a political subdivision, including but not limited
to an adverse employment action, exclusion, sanction or
punishment.
(b) Any person aggrieved by a violation of subsection
(a) of this section may file a civil action in any court of
competent jurisdiction against the state or any political
subdivision, and its employees acting in their official
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0077
ENROLLED ACT NO. 23, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
capacities, responsible for the violation to seek
injunctive or declaratory relief.
Section 2. This act applies to conduct occurring on
or after July 1, 2025 to which liability under this act
applies.
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2